New Jersey, session 221, S3144.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  a.  All drivers of buses or other vehicles used by a board of education or by a private or parochial school for the transportation of pupils to and from school shall, in addition to any other medical exam or testing required by law, submit to unannounced medical testing twice each school year for the presence of alcohol, narcotics, or habit-producing drugs within the scope of the "New Jersey Controlled Dangerous Substances Act," P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-1 et seq.). The employing board of education or contractor shall determine the timing of the medical testing and shall receive the results of the medical testing. b.    A school bus driver shall be immediately ineligible to operate a school bus or other vehicle used by a board of education or by a private or parochial school for the transportation of pupils to and from school if: (1)   the results of the medical testing required pursuant to this section disqualifies the driver from continued service; or (2)   the driver refuses to submit to such medical testing. c.     The Commissioner of Education shall establish criteria for disqualifying a school bus driver from the continued operation of a school bus or other vehicle used for the transportation of pupils based on the results of medical testing required pursuant to this section. d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a school bus driver shall not be terminated from employment on the basis of the results of the drivers medical testing without an opportunity to challenge the accuracy of the disqualifying testing report. The Commissioner of Education shall develop an appeal process to resolve any dispute raised by a school bus driver concerning a disqualification made pursuant to this section. 2.    N.J.S.18A:39-17 is amended to read as follows: 18A:39-17.  In each school year, prior to the assignment of any driver or substitute driver to any vehicle operated by the board of education of any district as a school bus, there shall be filed by the secretary of such board with the county superintendent the name and social security number of each such driver or substitute driver and certification of a valid school bus driver's license, criminal background check, and evidence of a check for the driver's record of alcohol and drug-related motor vehicle violations pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1989, c.104 (C.18A:39-19.1) and of the medical testing required pursuant to section 1 of P.L.   , c.    (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2003, c.66, s.2) 3.    N.J.S.18A:39-18 is amended to read as follows: 18A:39-18.  In each school year, prior to the beginning of transportation of school pupils under a contract awarded by a board of education, the contractor shall furnish to the county superintendent the name, social security number, and certification of a valid school bus driver's license and criminal background check, and evidence of a check for the driver's record of alcohol and drug-related motor vehicle violations pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1989, c.104 (C.18A:39-19.1) and of the medical testing required pursuant to section 1 of P.L.   , c.    (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) of each driver or substitute driver to be assigned to any vehicle in the performance of his contract. (cf: P.L.2003, c.66, s.3) 4.    This act shall take effect in the first full school year following the date of enactment.